California statutes. Family Code
(a) A revolving fund in the State Treasury is hereby created to be known as the Child Support Services Advance Fund. All moneys deposited into the fund are for the purpose of making a consolidated payment or advance to counties, state agencies, or other governmental entities, comprised of the state and federal share of costs associated with the programs administered by the Department of Child Support Services, inclusive of the payment of refunds. In addition, the fund may be used for the purpose of making a consolidated payment to a payee, comprised of the state and federal shares of local assistance costs associated with the programs administered by the Department of Child Support Services.

(b) Payments or advances of funds to counties, state agencies, or other governmental agencies and other payees doing business with the state that are properly chargeable to appropriations or other funds in the State Treasury, may be made by a Controller’s warrant drawn against the Child Support Services Advance Fund. For every warrant so issued, a remittance advice shall be issued by the Department of Child Support Services to identify the purposes and amounts for which it was drawn.

(c) The amounts to be transferred to the Child Support Services Advance Fund at any time shall be determined by the department, and, upon order of the Controller, shall be transferred from the funds and appropriations otherwise properly chargeable.

(d) Refunds of amounts disbursed from the Child Support Services Advance Fund shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the Child Support Services Advance Fund, and, on order of the Controller, shall be transferred therefrom to the funds and appropriations from which those amounts were originally derived. Claims for amounts erroneously deposited into the Child Support Services Advance Fund shall be submitted by the department to the Controller who, if the claims are approved, shall draw a warrant in payment thereof against the Child Support Services Advance Fund.

(e) All amounts increasing the cash balance in the Child Support Services Advance Fund, that were derived from the cancellation of warrants issued therefrom, shall, on order of the Controller, be transferred to the appropriations from which the amounts were
 originally derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 165.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.

(a) For the 1998–99 fiscal year the department shall pay to each county a child support incentive payment. Every county shall receive the federal child support incentive. A county shall receive the state child support incentive if it elects to do both of the following:

(1) Comply with the reporting requirements of Section 17600 while federal financial participation is available for collecting and reporting data.

(2) Comply with federal and state child support laws and regulations, or has a corrective action plan certified by the department pursuant to Section 17702. The combined federal and state incentive payment shall be 13.6 percent of distributed collections. If the amount appropriated by the Legislature for the state incentives is less than the amount necessary to satisfy each county’s actual incentives pursuant to this section, each county shall receive its proportional share of incentives.

(b) (1) Beginning July 1, 1999, the department shall pay to each county a child support incentive for child support collections. Every county shall receive the federal child support incentive. The combined federal and state incentive payments shall be 13.6 percent of distributed collections. In addition to the federal child support incentive, each county may also receive a state child support incentive. A county shall receive the state child support incentive if it elects to do both of the following:

(A) Comply with the reporting requirements of Section 17600 while federal financial participation is available for collecting and reporting data.

(B) Be in compliance with federal and state child support laws and regulations, or have a performance improvement plan certified by the department pursuant to Section 17702.

(2) (A) For purposes of paragraph (1),
 the federal incentive component shall be each county’s share of the child support incentive payments that the state receives from the federal government, based on the county’s collections.

(B) (i) Effective July 1, 1999, and annually thereafter, state funds appropriated for child support incentives shall first be used to fund the administrative costs incurred by local child support agencies in administering the child support program, excluding automation costs as set forth in Section 10085 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, after subtracting all federal financial participation for administrative costs and all federal child support incentives received by the state and passed on to the local child support agencies. The department shall allocate sufficient resources to each local child support agency to fully fund the remaining administrative costs of its budget as approved by the director pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 17306,
 subject to the appropriation of funding in the annual Budget Act. No later than January 1, 2000, the department shall identify allowable administrative costs that may be claimed for reimbursement from the state, which shall be limited to reasonable amounts in relation to the scope of services and the total funds available. If the total amount of administrative costs claimed in any year exceeds the amount appropriated in the Budget Act, the amount provided to local child support agencies shall be reduced by the percentage necessary to ensure that projected General Fund expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized in the Budget Act.

(ii) Effective July 1, 2001, and annually thereafter, after allowable administrative costs are funded under clause (i), the department shall use any remaining unallocated incentive funds appropriated from the prior fiscal year which are hereby reappropriated to implement an incentive program that rewards up to 10 local child support agencies in each
 year, based on their performance or increase in performance on one or more of the federal performance standards set forth in Section 458 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 658), or state performance standards set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 17602, as determined by the department. The department shall determine the number of local agencies that receive state incentive funds under this program, subject to a maximum of 10 agencies and shall determine the amount received by each local agency based on the availability of funds and each local child support agency’s proportional share based on the performance standard or standards used.

(iii) Any funds received pursuant to this subdivision shall be used only for child support enforcement activities.

(c) Each county shall continue to receive its federal child support incentive funding whether or not it elects to participate in the state child support incentive funding program.

(d) The department shall provide incentive funds pursuant to this section only during any fiscal year in which funding is provided for that purpose in the Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 308, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17708.

(a) This section shall apply to any county that elects to participate in the state incentive program described in Section 17704.

(b) Each participating county child support enforcement program shall provide the data required by Section 17600 to the department on a quarterly basis. The data shall be provided no later than 15 days after the end of each quarter.

(c) On and after July 1, 1998, a county shall be required to comply with the provisions of this section only during fiscal years in which funding is provided for that purpose in the Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 19.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.

(a) Each county shall be responsible for any administrative expenditures for administering the child support program not covered by federal and state funds.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), effective July 1, 1991, to June 30, 1992, inclusive, counties shall pay the nonfederal share of the administrative costs of conducting the reviews required under former Section 15200.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code from the savings counties will obtain as a result of the reduction in the maximum aid payments specified in Section 11450. Effective July 1, 1992, to June 30, 1993, inclusive, the state shall pay the nonfederal share of administrative costs of conducting the reviews required
 under former Section 15200.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Funding for county costs after June 30, 1993, shall be subject to the availability of funds in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 474, Sec. 26.   (AB 2882)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17712.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 17708, and to the extent funds are appropriated by the annual Budget Act, funds shall be provided to the Judicial Council for the nonfederal share of costs for the costs of child support commissioners pursuant to Section 4251 and family law facilitators pursuant to Division 14 (commencing with Section 10000). The Judicial Council shall distribute the funds to the counties for the purpose of matching federal funds for the costs of child support commissioners and family law facilitators and related costs. Funds distributed pursuant to this section may also be used to offset the nonfederal share of costs incurred by the Judicial Council for performing the duties specified in Sections 4252 and 10010.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17714.

(a) (1) Any funds paid to a county pursuant to this chapter prior to June 30, 1999, which exceed the county’s cost of administering the child support program of the local child support agency pursuant to Section 17400 to that date, hereafter referred to as “excess funds,” shall be expended by the county only upon that program. All these excess funds shall be deposited by the county into a special fund established by the county for this purpose.

(2) Performance incentive funds shall include, but not be limited to, incentive funds paid pursuant to Section 17704, and performance incentive funds paid pursuant to Section 14124.93 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and all interest earned on deposits in the special fund. Performance incentive funds shall not include funds paid pursuant to Section 17706. Performance incentive funds shall be expended by the county only upon that program. All performance incentive funds
 shall be deposited by the county into a special fund established by the county for this purpose.

(b) All excess funds and performance incentive funds shall be expended by the county on the support enforcement program of the local child support agency within two fiscal years following the fiscal year of receipt of the funds by the county. Except as provided in subdivision (c), any excess funds or performance incentive funds paid pursuant to this chapter since July 1, 1992, that the department determines have not been spent within the required two-year period shall revert to the state General Fund, and shall be distributed by the department only to counties that have complied with this section. The formula for distribution shall be based on the number of CalWORKs cases within each county.

(c) A county that submits to the department a written plan approved by that county’s local child support agency for the expenditure of excess funds or performance
 incentive funds shall be exempted from the requirements of subdivision (b), if the department determines that the expenditure will be cost-effective, will maximize federal funds, and the expenditure plan will require more than the time provided for in subdivision (b) to expend the funds. Once the department approves a plan pursuant to this subdivision, funds received by a county and designated for an expenditure in the plan shall not be expended by the county for any other purpose.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to nullify the recovery and reversion to the General Fund of unspent incentive funds as provided in Section 6 of Chapter 479 of the Statutes of 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 20.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Complaint Resolution [17800. - 17804.]

17800.

Each local child support agency shall maintain a complaint resolution process. The department shall specify by regulation, no later than July 1, 2001, uniform forms and procedures that each local child support agency shall use in resolving all complaints received from custodial and noncustodial parents. A complaint shall be made within 90 days after the custodial or noncustodial parent affected knew or should have known of the child support action complained of. The local child support agency shall provide a written resolution of the complaint within 30 days of the receipt of the complaint. The director of the local child support agency may extend the period for resolution of the complaint an additional 30 days in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 17804.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 21.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17801.

(a) A custodial or noncustodial parent who is dissatisfied with the local child support agency’s resolution of a complaint shall be accorded an opportunity for a state hearing when one or more of the following actions or failures to take action by the department or the local child support agency is claimed by the parent:

(1) An application for child support services has been denied or has not been acted upon within the required timeframe.

(2) The child support services case has been acted upon in violation of state or federal law or regulation or department letter ruling, or has not yet been acted upon within the required timeframe,
 including services for the establishment, modification, and enforcement of child support orders and child support accountings.

(3) Child support collections have not been distributed or have been distributed or disbursed incorrectly, or the amount of child support arrears, as calculated by the department or the local child support agency is inaccurate. The amount of the court order for support, including current support and arrears, is not subject to a state hearing under this section.

(4) The child support agency’s decision to close a child support case.

(b) Prior to requesting a hearing pursuant to subdivision (a), the custodial or noncustodial parent shall exhaust the complaint resolution process required in
 Section 17800, unless the local child support agency has not, within the 30-day period required by that section, submitted a written resolution of the complaint. If the custodial or noncustodial parent does not receive that timely written
 resolution, the custodial parent may request a hearing pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) A hearing shall be provided under subdivision (a) when the request for a hearing is made within 90 days after receiving the written notice of resolution required in Section 17800 or, if no written notice of resolution is provided within 30 days from the date the complaint was made, within 90 days after making the complaint.

(d) (1) A hearing under subdivision (a) shall be set to commence within 45 days after the request is received by the state hearing office, and at least 10 days prior to the hearing, all parties shall be given written notice of the time and place of the hearing. Unless the time period is waived by the complainant, the proposed hearing decision
 shall be rendered by the state hearing office within 75 days after the request for a state hearing is received by the state hearing office. The department shall have 15 days from the date the proposed decision is rendered to act upon the decision. When a hearing is postponed, continued, or reopened with the consent of the complainant, the time for issuance of the decision, and action on the decision by the department, shall be extended for a period of time consistent with the postponement, continuance, or reopening.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the “state hearing office” refers to the division of the office or agency designated by the department to carry out state hearings, that conducts those state hearings.

(e) To the extent not inconsistent with this section,
 hearings under subdivision (a) shall be provided in the same manner in which hearings are provided in Sections 10950 to 10967 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the State Department of Social Services’ regulations implementing and interpreting those sections.

(f) Pendency of a state hearing shall not affect the obligation to comply with an existing child support order.

(g) A child support determination that is subject to the jurisdiction of the superior court and that is required by law to be addressed by motion, order to show cause, or appeal under this code shall not be subject to a state hearing under this section. The director shall, by regulation, specify and exclude from the subject matter jurisdiction of state hearings provided under subdivision (a),
 grievances arising from a child support case in the superior court that must, by law, be addressed by motion, order to show cause, or appeal under this code.

(h) The local child support agency shall comply with, and execute, every decision of the director rendered pursuant to this section.

(i) The director shall contract with the State Department of Social Services or the Office of Administrative Hearings for the provision of state hearings in accordance with this section.

(j) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that there is federal financial participation available at the child support funding rate set forth in Section 655(a)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 166.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17803.

The custodial or noncustodial parent, within one year after receiving notice of the director’s final decision, may file a petition with the superior court, under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, praying for a review of the entire proceedings in the matter, upon questions of law involved in the case. The review, if granted, shall be the exclusive remedy available to the custodial or noncustodial parent for review of the director’s decision. The director shall be the sole respondent in the proceedings. A filing fee shall not be required for the filing of a petition pursuant to this section. Any such petition to the superior court shall be entitled to a preference in setting a date for hearing on the petition. A
 bond shall not be required in the case of any petition for review, nor in any appeal therefrom. The custodial or noncustodial parent shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, if the parent obtains a decision in their favor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 167.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17804.

Each local child support agency shall establish the complaint resolution process specified in Section 17800. The department shall implement the state hearing requirements specified in Section 17801 no later than July 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 22.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20. PILOT PROJECTS [20000. - 20043.]



PART 1. FAMILY LAW PILOT PROJECTS [20000. - 20043.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [20000. - 20002.]

20000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Child and spousal support are serious legal obligations. In addition, children are frequently left in limbo while their parents engage in protracted litigation concerning custody and visitation. The current system for obtaining child and spousal support orders is suffering because the family courts are unduly burdened with heavy case loads and personnel insufficient to meet the needs of increased demands on the courts.

(2) There is a compelling state interest in the development of a child and spousal support system that is cost-effective and accessible to families with middle or low incomes.

(3) There is a compelling state interest in first implementing such a system on a small scale.

(4) There is a compelling state interest in the development of a speedy, conflict-reducing method of resolving
 custody and visitation disputes.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to provide a means for experimenting with and evaluating procedural innovations with significant potential to improve the California child and spousal support systems, and the system for mediation, evaluation, and litigation of custody and visitation disputes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20001.

The Superior Courts of the Counties of Santa Clara and San Mateo may conduct pilot projects pursuant to this part. Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20010) shall govern the San Mateo County Pilot Project, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20030) shall govern the Santa Clara County Pilot Project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20002.

The duration of the pilot projects shall be two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. San Mateo County Pilot Project [20010. - 20026.]

20010.

The San Mateo County Pilot Project shall apply to hearings on motions for temporary child support, temporary spousal support, and temporary health insurance issuable in proceedings under this code, where at least one party is unrepresented by counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20011.

Motions for temporary orders under this chapter shall be heard as soon as practicable, consistent with the rules governing other civil actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20012.

The court shall appoint a Family Law Evaluator, who shall be available to assist parties. By local rule the superior court may designate the duties of the Family Law Evaluator, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Requiring litigants in actions which involve temporary child support, temporary spousal support, and temporary maintenance of health insurance in which at least one litigant is unrepresented, to meet with the Family Law Evaluator prior to the support hearing.

(b) Preparing support schedules based on standardized formulae accessed through existing up-to-date computer technology.

(c) Drafting stipulations to include all issues agreed to by the parties.

(d) Prior to, or at, any hearing pursuant to this chapter, reviewing the paperwork by the court, advising the judge whether or not the matter is ready to proceed, and making a recommendation to
 the court regarding child support, spousal support, and health insurance.

(e) Assisting the clerk in maintaining records.

(f) Preparing a formal order consistent with the court’s announced oral order, unless one of the parties is represented by an attorney.

(g) Assisting the court with research and any other responsibilities which will enable the court to be responsive to the litigants’ needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20013.

The court shall provide the Family Law Evaluator at no cost to the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20014.

The clerk shall stamp all moving papers in which a party is not represented by counsel with a notice of a requirement to see the Family Law Evaluator. The unrepresented party shall serve the stamped pleadings on the other party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20015.

The court shall adopt a protocol wherein all litigants, both unrepresented by counsel and represented by counsel, have ultimate access to a hearing before the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20016.

The court may elect to publish a low-cost booklet describing this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20017.

The Family Law Evaluator shall be an attorney, licensed to practice in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20018.

Orders for temporary support issued pursuant to this chapter shall comply with the statewide uniform guideline set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4050) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 9 and shall be based on the economic evidence supplied by the parties or otherwise available to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20019.

Where it appears from a party’s application for an order under this chapter or otherwise in the proceedings that the custody of, or visitation with, a minor child is contested, the court shall set those issues for mediation pursuant to Section 3170. The pendency of the mediation proceedings shall not delay a hearing on any other matter for which a temporary order is required, including child support, and a separate hearing, if required, shall be scheduled respecting the custody and visitation issues following mediation in accordance with Section 3170. However, the court may grant a continuance for good cause shown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20020.

In a contested proceeding for temporary child or spousal support under this chapter, both the moving party and the responding party shall provide all of the following documents to the Family Law Evaluator, and to the court at the time of the hearing:

(a) Copies of the last two federal and state income tax returns filed.

(b) Paycheck stubs for all paychecks received in the four months immediately prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20021.

A party who fails to submit documents to the court as required by Section 20020 may, in the court’s discretion, not be granted the relief requested, or the court may impose evidentiary sanctions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20022.

The tax return submitted pursuant to Section 20020 may be reviewed by the other party. A party may be examined by the other party as to the contents of the tax return.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20023.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c):

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to a child for whom services are provided or required to be provided by a district attorney pursuant to Section 11475.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The court shall not hear or enter any order under this chapter in a matter involving such a child.

(b) Any order entered contrary to the provisions of subdivision (a) is void and without legal effect.

(c) For purposes of enabling a custodial parent receiving assistance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to participate in a pilot project authorized by this chapter, the district attorney, upon the request of the custodial parent, may execute a limited waiver of the obligation or representation under Section 11475.1 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code. These limited waivers shall be signed by both the district attorney and custodial parent and shall only permit the custodial parent to participate in the proceedings under this chapter. It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to limit the duties of district attorneys with respect to seeking child support payments or to in any way limit or supersede other provisions of this code respecting temporary child support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20026.

(a) It is estimated that under the pilot project authorized by this chapter, approximately 2,200 litigants will be served annually and that the following savings will occur:

(1) The program would save 520 hours, or 65 days, of court time per year.

(2) There would be a concomitant saving of time by litigants due to the expedited proceedings and, in addition, there would be a saving to litigants of wages that would otherwise be lost due to time off from work.

(b) The estimated costs of the pilot project are as follows:

(1) The salaries of the Family Law Evaluator and any staff necessary for the evaluator to carry out the evaluator’s functions.

(2) The cost of a booklet, if any, describing the program.

(c) There would be no cost for the following:

(1) Computers, printers, or other equipment. This equipment is already available in the family law department.

(2) Training for the Family Law Evaluator or the evaluator’s staff. They will be trained by already existing judicial personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 168.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Santa Clara County Pilot Project [20030. - 20043.]

20030.

The Superior Court of the County of Santa Clara may conduct a pilot project pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20031.

The pilot project applies to all hearings, for temporary or permanent child or spousal support, modifications thereof, health insurance, custody, or visitation in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, nullity of marriage, legal separation of the parties, exclusive custody, or pursuant to the Uniform Parentage Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20032.

(a) Each and every hearing in a proceeding described in Section 20031 in which child or spousal support is at issue, including related contempt matters, shall be set by the clerk of the court for hearing within 30 days of filing.

(b) At any hearing in which child or spousal support is at issue, each party, both moving and responding, shall bring to the hearing, copies of the last two federal and state income tax returns filed by the party and pay stubs from the last four full months immediately preceding the hearing received by the party, and shall serve those documents on the opposing party at least five days in advance of the hearing date. Willful failure to comply with these requirements or any of the requirements of this pilot project may result in a citation for contempt under Title 5 (commencing with Section 1209) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or in the court’s discretion, the court may refuse to grant relief requested or
 may impose evidentiary sanctions on a party who fails to submit these documents. The clerk shall cause to be placed on the face sheet of any moving papers for child or spousal support at the time of filing, a notice informing the parties of the requirements of this section. The notice shall also inform the parties that prior to the hearing, they must meet with the Attorney-Mediator pursuant to Section 20034. That meeting may occur in advance of the hearing dates by agreement of the parties, or on the day of the hearing.

(c) No continuance of any hearing involving child or spousal support shall be granted by a court without an order setting an interim support level unless the parties stipulate otherwise or the court finds good cause therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20033.

The court may pass a local rule that suspends the use of the Income and Expense Declaration mandated by California Rule of Court 1285.50 in some or all proceedings during the pendency of the pilot project, provided that substitute forms are developed and adopted to solicit substantially the same information in a simplified format. The court may, notwithstanding the adoption of a local form, require the use of the Income and Expense Declaration mandated by California Rule of Court 1285.50 in appropriate cases on the motion of either party or on the court’s own motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20034.

(a) An attorney, known as an Attorney-Mediator, shall be hired to assist the court in resolving child and spousal support disputes, to develop community outreach programs, and to undertake other duties as assigned by the court.

(b) The Attorney-Mediator shall be an attorney, licensed to practice in this state, with mediation or litigation experience, or both, in the field of family law.

(c) By local rule, the superior court may designate the duties of the Attorney-Mediator, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Meeting with litigants to
 mediate issues of child support, spousal support, and maintenance of health insurance. Actions in which one or both of the parties are unrepresented by counsel shall have priority.

(2) Preparing support schedules based on statutory guidelines accessed through existing up-to-date computer technology.

(3) Drafting stipulations to include all issues agreed to by the parties, which may include issues other than those specified in Section 20031.

(4) If the parties are unable to resolve issues with the assistance of the Attorney-Mediator, prior to or at the hearing, and at the request of the court, the Attorney-Mediator shall review the paperwork, examine documents, prepare support schedules, and advise the judge whether
 or not the matter is ready to proceed.

(5) Assisting the clerk in maintaining records.

(6) Preparing formal orders consistent with the court’s announced order in cases where both parties are unrepresented.

(7) Serving as a special master to hearing proceedings and making findings to the court unless the individual has served as a mediator in that case.

(8) Assisting the court with research and any other responsibilities that will enable the court to be responsive to the litigants’ needs.

(9) Developing programs for bar and community outreach through day and evening programs, video recordings, and other
 innovative means that will assist unrepresented and financially disadvantaged litigants in gaining meaningful access to family court. These programs shall specifically include information concerning underutilized legislation, such as expedited temporary support orders (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3620) of Part 1 of Division 9), modification of support orders (Article 3 (commencing with Section 3680) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 9), and preexisting, court-sponsored programs, such as supervised visitation and appointment of attorneys for children.

(d) The court shall develop a protocol wherein all litigants, both unrepresented by counsel and represented by counsel, have ultimate access to a hearing before the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 169.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

20035.

Orders for temporary support issued pursuant to this chapter shall comply with the statewide uniform guideline set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4050) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 9 and shall be based on the economic evidence supplied by the parties or otherwise available to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20036.

Upon motion by either party or on the court’s own motion, any proceeding that would otherwise fall within this pilot project may by judicial order be exempted from its requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20037.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c):

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to a child for whom services are provided or required to be provided by a district attorney pursuant to Section 11475.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The court shall not hear or enter any order under this chapter in a matter involving such a child.

(b) Any order entered contrary to subdivision (a) is void and without legal effect.

(c) For purposes of enabling a custodial parent receiving assistance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to participate in a pilot project authorized by this chapter, the district attorney, upon the request of the custodial parent, may execute a limited waiver of the obligation of representation under Section 11475.1 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code. These limited waivers shall be signed by both the district attorney and custodial parent and shall only permit the custodial parent to participate in the proceedings under this chapter. It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to limit the duties of district attorneys with respect to seeking child support payments or to in any way limit or supersede other provisions of this code respecting temporary child support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20038.
